trunk/resultats/catalan_i.dic
aborrallona/D
abstinent/EVY
acamussi/D
aclapari/D
aclimatabilitat/EVY
acredita/D
acusable/EVY
adoctrina/D
adverbialitzadora/EVY
aerobús/IVY
afeccioni/D
africa/D
africanista/EVY
agafa-sants/IVY
agrege/D
aguditzada/EVY
aiguamoix/IVY
ajuda/DEVY
albergener/EVY
alfarràs/IVYZ
aljava/EVY
alleugeresqui/D
al·loempelt/EVY
amanere/D
amantbraç/IVY
ametllerar/EVY
amonede/D
anacronisme/EVY
anglonormanda/EVY
angoixa/DEVY
antidetonant/EVY
antixocs/IVY
antònim/EVY
apanyussi/D
aplantille/D
aplegapilotes/EVY
apropinqüe/D
arabitzant/CEVY
arboç/IVY
armament/EVY
arpeja/D
arresti/D
arrossegadora/EVY
arç/IVY
aspa/EVY
aspergesqui/D
assoleixi/D
astràgal/EVY
atans/IVY
atipe/D
atzavara/EVY
autentiqui/D
autobús/IVY
avalot/EVY
avenç/IVY
aïlli/D
badador/E
balaix/I
banyegui/D
bar/E
bardaix/I
baterell/E
batzegue/D
bes/I
besuc/E
bibliobús/I
biquars/I
birbi/D
bitxera/E
bocadolç/I
bonifica/D
bordada/E
boç/I
branque/D
brec/E
brunzeixi/D
budista/E
bufaforats/I
cabestra/DE
cabeç/I
cadella/D
calamars/I
caldeu/E
calís/I
cambrege/D
cangrea/E
capicule/D
capmàs/I
capsotera/E
carcatràs/I
carie/D
carofícia/E
carés/I
catalanofòbia/E
cavalloni/D
cens/I
centcames/E
cercapoals/I
cinamat/E
circumde/D
claveteria/E
coacerva/D
coetània/E
colgafocs/I
colzi/D
començ/I
comicitat/E
compartisca/D
compta-revolucions/I
conciliï/D
confessionari/E
congeli/D
consens/I
consolidi/D
continent/E
contraforge/D
contumaç/I
convulsa/D
copal/E
correcamins/I
corriolegi/D
corruptela/E
cricoide/E
crisme/D
cruix/CIU
cuirol/E
curs/I
cúpula/E
dalina/D
decuplica/D
deix/I
deliberant/CE
delinquesqui/D
derogui/D
desagradi/D
desapuntali/D
desatenga/D
descalça/D
descens/I
desclavador/E
descolle/D
descovi/D
desembarassi/D
desemmandresqui/D
desemperesisca/D
desencapsa/D
desencossiï/D
desenfurisme/D
desenlluerni/D
desentenebra/D
desestanya/D
desglace/D
desglaç/I
desinforme/D
desnivellament/E
desocupe/D
dessole/D
devora/D
dictat/BE
discurs/I
dissabte/E
dissuadesqui/D
dors/I
draga/DE
edematosa/EVY
eix/IJVY
eixarcole/D
electrogalvanisme/EVY
embastona/D
embolicada/EVY
emmalese/D
empaitada/EVY
empate/D
empatx/IVY
emproe/D
ena/EVY
encarregue/D
enclavada/EVY
encorri/DZ
encís/IVYZ
enervant/CEVY
enferritgi/D
enganyabadocs/IVY
engeloseixi/D
engrapada/EVY
enllaç/IVY
enllistone/D
enriquidora/EVY
ensabona/D
entolla/D
entossudida/EVY
entremès/IJVY
entropessi/D
envol/EVY
equànime/EVY
erri/D
esbutzada/EVY
escabetxi/D
escalfallits/IVY
escanyacavalls/IVY
escanyapits/IVY
escatada/EVY
escintil·li/D
escorç/IVY
escotorida/EVY
escuraflascons/IVY
esfetgega/D
església/EVY
esmorrelle/D
espantallops/IVY
espaterrant/CEVY
espina/DEVY
espitllada/EVY
esqueix/IVY
esquivament/EVY
estabornesqui/D
estassabarders/IVY
esteroide/EVY
estridència/EVY
estrinxoli/D
estripa-sacs/IVY
eugenol/EVY
exhibisca/D
existida/EVY
facoquer/E
fal·laç/I
fantasiege/D
fatigant/CE
felús/I
fes/CIJ
fetus/E
fitòloga/E
flamulege/D
fluix/IJ
fonologista/E
fragmenta/D
franquisme/E
fris/I
furgoneta/E
galavars/I
gambirot/E
garantisca/D
garritx/I
gemmologia/E
giradiscs/I
glaciologia/E
gotellima/D
grada/E
gratabous/I
gruid/E
gruix/I
guardacaps/I
guardapols/I
halterofília/EVY
harmonitze/D
herbei/EVY
hidroxilamida/EY
hipobromós/IVY
hipoiodós/IVY
homicida/EVY
idil·li/EVY
impremte/D
impressible/EVY
incapaç/IVY
indamina/EY
infix/IVY
inflor/EY
injecte/D
intel·ligència/EY
invoque/D
jaquès/I
joule/E
liqüescència/E
lladrunye/D
llambroix/I
llassís/I
llepafils/I
llotim/E
lluís/I
maceri/D
maldulls/I
mamiforme/E
mancús/I
manyuclegi/D
marraix/I
mas/I
matablats/I
matx/EI
mazdeista/E
menjamosquits/I
merite/D
messies/I
microsclera/E
milpeus/I
monomania/E
moraduix/I
mordente/D
múltiplex/E
napís/I
nielle/D
nord-oest/E
nus/I
ocàs/IVY
oi/EVY
ondege/D
orquestrina/EVY
pancatalanisme/E
papadiners/I
papallonege/D
parafils/I
passacamins/I
patogenicitat/E
pavès/I
peix/CIS
pequi/D
percaç/I
permeància/E
pes/I
pesalicors/I
pilotege/D
pisolita/E
pitjapapers/I
plus/I
polisèmia/E
pompeja/D
portaaeronaus/I
portacigars/I
portaescuradents/I
precoç/I
prepuci/E
pressiona/D
procaç/I
proveïu/D
pterigoide/E
quars/I
qüestura/E
rarefaci/D
ras/IJ
rebals/I
recautxuta/D
recrementícia/E
reelegeixi/D
reesmerç/I
regalaix/I
rehabilite/D
rentacaps/I
reordene/D
repix/I
repudiament/E
repòs/I
resquitx/I
ressedimente/D
reverencie/D
ronda/DE
ros/BI
rufli/D
salaç/I
saltironant/CE
sandvitx/I
sedegi/D
sentor/E
sequaç/I
sis/I
sobrecor/E
sobreentendre/D
somrís/I
sordeja/D
suc/E
superposi/D
tallacigars/I
tapabruts/I
tapapunts/I
tapir/E
tas/I
teleprocés/I
tempte/D
terrotxa/E
tirapits/I
torcamans/I
torçal/E
tosque/D
travacavalls/I
travi/D
trencanous/I
tres/I
trinxat/BE
troleibús/I
ultime/D
uniaxial/EVY
veraç/I
vermellege/D
verònica/E
xafaldet/E
xaqui/D
xoriç/I
àtropa/EVY
